Utah statutes.
4-31-107.   Appraisal of fair market value before destruction.

(1)  Before any livestock or property is condemned and destroyed under Section 4-31-106, an appraisal of the fair market value of the livestock or other property shall be forwarded to the commissioner by a panel of three qualified appraisers appointed as follows:

(a)  one by the commissioner;

(b)  one by the owner of the livestock or other property subject to condemnation; and

(c)  one by the appraisers specified in Subsections (1)(a) and (b).

(2)  After review, the commissioner shall forward the appraisal to the board of examiners described in Subsection 63G-9-201(2), together with the commissioner's recommendation concerning the amount, if any, that should be allowed.

(3)  Any costs incurred in the appraisal shall be paid by the state.

